West Virginia, session 2026, SB271.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-1-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (distribution of state funds for support of local boards of health, 64 CSR 67), is authorized.